North Dakota, session 69, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-52.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Health insurance benefits coverage - Fertility health care .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Diagnosis of infertility" means the services, procedures, testing, or medications
recommended by a licensed physician which are consistent with established,
published, or approved best practices or professional standards or guidelines,
including the American society of reproductive medicine, the American college of
obstetricians and gynecologists, or the American society of clinical oncology for
diagnosing and treating infertility.
b. "Fertility treatment" means health care services, procedures, testing,
medications, monitoring, treatments, or products, including genetic testing and
assisted reproductive technologies, including oocyte retrievals, in vitro
fertilization, and fresh and frozen embryo transfers, provided with the intent to
achieve a pregnancy that results in a live birth with a healthy outcome.
c. "Infertility" means a disease or condition characterized by:
(1) The failure to conceive a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after unprotected sexual intercourse;
Page No. 1 25.0069.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) An individual's inability to cause pregnancy and live birth either as a covered
individual or with the covered individual's partner; or
(3) A licensed health care provider's findings and statement based on a
patient's medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age, physical findings, or
diagnostic testing.
d. "Medically necessary" means a health care service or product provided in a
manner:
(1) Consistent with the findings and recommendations of a licensed physician,
based on a patient's medical history, sexual and reproductive history, age,
partner, physical findings, or diagnostic testing;
(2) Consistent with generally accepted standards of medical practice as set
forth by a professional medical organization with a specialization in any
aspect of reproductive health, including the American society for
reproductive medicine or the American college of obstetricians and
gynecologists; or
(3) Clinically appropriate in terms of type, frequency, extent, site, and duration.
e. "Monitoring" includes, ultrasounds, transvaginal ultrasounds, laboratory testing,
and followup appointments.
f. "Third-party reproductive care for the benefit of the covered individual" means the
use of eggs, sperm, or embryos donated to the covered individual or partner by a
donor, or the use of a gestational carrier, to achieve a live birth with a healthy
outcome.
2. The board shall provide coverage for the expenses of the diagnosis of infertility and
fertility treatment services if recommended and medically necessary.
a. Coverage must include:
(1) Three completed cycles of intrauterine insemination, in accordance with
best practices, including the standards and guidelines of the American
society of reproductive medicine.
(2) Fertility treatment services necessary to achieve two live births, or a
maximum of four completed oocyte retrievals with four fresh and frozen
embryo transfers, in accordance with best practices, including the guidelines
Page No. 2 25.0069.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
of the American society for reproductive medicine, and using no more than
two embryos per transfer.
(3) Diagnosis of infertility and fertility treatment services, including third-party
reproductive care for the benefit of the covered individual or partner.
(4) Fertility treatment, consisting of a method of causing pregnancy other than
sexual intercourse which is provided with the intent to create a legal
paren t - child relationship between the covered individual and the resulting
child in accordance with chapter 14 - 20 .
(5) Medical and laboratory services that reduce excess embryo creation
through egg cryopreservation and thawing in accordance with a covered
individual's religious or ethical beliefs.
(6) Five years of cryopreservation services.
b. This section may not be construed to deny the included coverage in this section
to an individual who forgoes a particular fertility treatment service if the
individual's physician determines the fertility treatment service is likely to be
unsuccessful.
3. To be covered under this section, the diagnosis of infertility and fertility treatment
services must be performed at a facility that conforms to best practices, including the
standards and guidelines developed by the American society for reproductive
medicine, the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists, or the American
society of clinical oncology.
4. Coverage under this section must be made available to all covered individuals,
including covered individuals who have entered coverage during special enrollment or
open enrollment.
5. Coverage under this section must be in accordance with best practices, including the
standards or guidelines developed by the American society of reproductive medicine,
the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists, or the American society of
clinical oncology. If a carrier makes, issues, circulates, or causes to be made, issued,
or circulated, clinical guidelines based on data not reasonably current or which do not
cite with specificity, the act constitutes unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the
business of insurance as prohibited by chapter 26.1 - 04 .
Page No. 3 25.0069.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
6. Benefits under this section may not be limited based on:
a. A copayment, deductible, coinsurance, benefit maximum, waiting period, or other
limitation on coverage different from maternity benefits provided under the health
benefits;
b. An exclusion, limitation, or other restriction on coverage of fertility medication
different from restrictions imposed on any other prescription medication;
c. A requirement that provides different benefits to, or imposes different
requirements on, a class protected under chapter 14 - 02.4 than that provided to or
required of other covered individuals; or
d. A pre-existing condition exclusion, pre-existing condition waiting period on
coverage for required benefits, or a prior diagnosis of infertility, fertility treatment,
or standard fertility preservation services.
7. This section does not apply to the Medicare par t D prescription drug coverage plan .
SECTION 2. PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM - FERTILITY HEALTH
BENEFITS - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. Pursuant to section 54-03-28, the public
employees retirement system shall prepare and submit for introduction a bill to the seventieth
legislative assembly to repeal the expiration date for this Act and to extend the coverage of
fertility health benefits to all group and individual health insurance policies. The public
employees retirement system shall append a report to the bill regarding the effect of the fertility
health benefits requirement on the system's health insurance programs, information on the
utilization and costs relating to the coverage, and a recommendation regarding whether the
coverage should be continued.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. This Act applies to health benefits coverage that begins after
June 30, 2025, and which does not extend past June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2027, and after that
date is ineffective.
Page No. 4 25.0069.03000